Utah statutes.
17D-1-204.   Prerequisites for adopting a resolution or ordinance approving
the creation of a special service district.
Before the legislative body of a county or municipality may adopt a resolution
or ordinance under Section 17D-1-208 approving the creation of a special
service district:
(1)  the clerk or recorder, as the case may be, of the county or municipality
shall give written notice as provided in Section 17D-1-205;
(2)  the legislative body shall hold a public hearing, as provided in Section
17D-1-207; and
(3)  the period for filing protests under Section 17D-1-206 shall have passed
without adequate protests having been filed.
